Utah statutes.
62A-15-640.   Mechanical restraints and medication -- Clinical record.
(1)  Mechanical restraints may not be applied to a patient unless it is
determined by the director or his designee to be required by the needs of the
patient.   Every use of a mechanical restraint and the reasons therefor shall
be made a part of the patient's clinical record, under the signature of the
director or his designee, and shall be reviewed regularly.
(2)  In no event shall medication be prescribed for a patient unless it is
determined by a physician to be required by the patient's medical needs. Every
use of a medication and the reasons therefor shall be made a part of the
patient's clinical record.
